California, session 20252026, AB1496.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26203 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:26203. (a) There is hereby established a task force on state and local regulation of commercial cannabis activity. The purpose of the task force is to promote communication between state and local entities engaged in the regulation of commercial cannabis activity and facilitate cooperation to enforce applicable state and local laws.(b) The task force shall be composed of representatives from all of the following:(1) The Department of Cannabis Control. (2) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.(3) The Department of Fish and Wildlife.(4) The State Water Resources Control Board.(5) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.(6) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency.(7) The Department of Justice.(8) All local jurisdictions and tribal governmental entities regulating commercial cannabis activity that opt to participate in the task force, which may send representatives from one or more of the following:(A) The contact person designated pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 26055. (B) A county sheriff’s office or municipal police department. (C) A district attorney’s office or city attorney’s office. (c) The task force shall meet twice each fiscal year, through teleconference or similar means to facilitate remote participation, for discussions to be convened and led by the Department of Cannabis Control. Discussion topics may include, but need not be limited to, enforcement against the illicit market, social equity programs, state licensing requirements, and labor and workforce compliance. (d) The task force shall not be subject to the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Section 26203 to the Business and Professions Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to protect the integrity of active and prospective administrative, civil, and criminal investigations conducted for law enforcement and licensing purposes; to prevent premature or overbroad disclosure of potentially sensitive information regarding those investigations to suspected violators of applicable state and local laws, as well as potential witnesses and others, in ways that might compromise those investigations; to allow members of the task force created by Section 26203 of the Business and Professions Code to more freely share information, and otherwise coordinate, regarding those investigations; and to otherwise promote fuller cooperation among members of the task force to enforce applicable state and local laws, it is necessary to exempt the task force from the provisions of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act and the Ralph M. Brown Act.